apertium-miq.miq.lexd
apia:apia                 # "not"
kau:kau
wiria:wiria
pat:pat                   # "already"
kau:kau                   # yet
yauhka:yauhka             # tomorrow
latara:latara             # outside
leihura:leihura           # far
mawanra:mawanra           # in front
ninara:ninara             # behind
tilara:tilara             # middle of
bilara:bilara             # inside
mayara:mayara             # below
tanira:tanira             # near
saura:saura               # badly
sin:sin                   # also
baku:baku                 # as/like
kaina:kaina               # before
aikuki:aikuki             # together

bâra:bâra                 # there
ban:ban                   # still

LEXICON Postpositions
ra:ra           # "to, in, at, on"
wal:wal         # "with"
wina:wina       # "from"
kat:kat         # until
kaka:kaka       # if
tani:tani       # beside

LEXICON Adjectives

blu:blu         # "blue"
damni:damni     # "sweet"
kumi:kumi       # "one"
mana:mana       # "expensive"
pain:pain       # "good/lovely/pretty"
pali:pali       # "very, especially"
pâli:pâli       # "flying/jumping"
pauni:pauni     # "red"
raya:raya       # "new"
ridi:ridi       # "ready"
sangni:sangni   # "green"
siksa:siksa     # "black"
sirpi:sirpi     # "small"
yamni:yamni     # "good"
praut:praut           # angry
sangni:sangni         # green or clear
damnei:damnei         # sweet
laonza:laonza         # dry
muswan:muswan         # wet
riawisa:riawisa       # rainy
ubalapta:ubalapta     # sunny
ubapayaska:ubapayaska # windy
wala:wala             # other
mairin:mairin       # "woman/female"
waitna:waitna       # "man/male"
wainhka:wainhka     # "male animal"
tara:tara           # big
blasi:blasi         # ancient
sip:sip             # capable
silp:silp           # for oneself
âpu:âpu             # zero
kumi:kumi           # one
wal:wal             # two
yumpha:yumpha       # three
matsip:matsip       # five
matawalsip          # ten
pri:pri             # free
sim:sim             # same
nahki:nahki         # how
wala:wala           # other
kunhku:kunhku       # short


LEXICON Determiners(2)

ahkia:ahkia         <itg>           # "which"
an:an               <itg>           # "how much/how many"
ani:ani             <itg>           # "which"
ansa:ansa           <itg>           # "where"
dia:dia             <itg>           # "what"
dîa:dîa             <itg>
nahkia:nahkia       <itg>           # "how"
ya:ya               <itg>           # "who"

ba:ba               <def><dst>      # "the"
na:na               <def><prx>      # "the (could be translated as this)"

naha:naha           <dem><prx>      # "this (closer to speaker)"
baha:baha           <dem>           # "this (could be translated as that)"
naura:naura         <dem>           # "that"
bukra:bukra         <dem><dst>      # "that (farther from speaker)"

nani:nani           <pl>            # "plural marker"
ap:ap               <ind>           # "some"
kum\ kum:kum\ kum   <ind>           # "a/some"

LEXICON Conjunctions

bara:bara               # "and"
dukiara:dukiara         # about/for
o:o                     # or

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/




# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
